Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Chapter 12 Miscellaneous Companies

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

18 Am. Jur. 2d Corporations § 1 et seq.

18 C.J.S. Corporations § 1 et seq.

§ 17-12-101.
Certificate of ditch company.

Whenever any three (3) or more persons associate under the provisions of this article, to form a company for the purpose of constructing a ditch or ditches for the purpose of conveying water to any mines, mills or lands to be used for mining, milling or irrigating of lands, they shall in their certificate, in addition to the matters required in the first section of this article, specify as follows: the stream or streams from which the water is to be taken out; the line of said ditch or ditches, as near as may be, and the use to which said water is intended to be applied.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 34, Tit. I, § 28; Laws 1884, ch. 24, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 532; R.S. 1899, § 3066; C.S. 1910, § 4009; C.S. 1920, § 5082; R.S. 1931, § 28-143; C.S. 1945, § 44-137; W.S. 1957, § 17-188.

Cross references. —

As to assessments against stockholders for care and maintenance of ditches, see §

41-5-105

.

Meaning of “this article” —

The term “this article,” referred to in this section, means article 1 of chapter 44 (§§ 44-101 through 44-151) of C.S. 1945, most of the provisions of which, including the “first section,” i.e., § 44-101, also referred to in this section, were repealed by Laws 1961, ch. 85, § 128. See now §

17-16-201

et seq. For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Cited

in

Willey v. Decker, 11 Wyo. 496, 73 P. 210,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1903).

§ 17-12-102.
Right-of-way of ditch company; interference with prior ditch and water rights.

Any ditch company formed under the provisions of this article shall have the right-of-way over the lines named in the certificate, and shall also have the right to run the water of the stream or streams named in the certificate through their ditch or ditches; provided, that the lines proposed shall not interfere with any other ditch whose rights are prior to those acquired under this article and by virtue of said certificate. Nor shall the water of any stream be directed from its original channel to the detriment of any miners, mill men or others along the line of said stream, or who may have a priority of right, and there shall be at all times left sufficient water in said stream for the use of miners and agriculturists who may have a prior right to such water along said stream.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 34, Tit. I, § 29; Laws 1884, ch. 24, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 533; R.S. 1899, § 3067; C.S. 1910, § 4010; C.S. 1920, § 5083; R.S. 1931, § 28-144; C.S. 1945, § 44-138; W.S. 1957, § 17-189.

Cross references. —

As to power of eminent domain, see §

1-26-801

et seq.

As to use of water for mining purposes, see §

30-1-117

.

As to right-of-way of any ditch or flume for mining purposes, see §

30-1-118

.

Meaning of “this article” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-12-101

.

Cited

in

Willey v. Decker, 11 Wyo. 496, 73 P. 210,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1903).

§ 17-12-103.
Proper condition of ditches.

Every ditch company organized under the provisions of this article shall be required to keep the banks of their ditch or ditches in good condition, so that the water shall not be allowed to escape from the same, to the injury of any mining claim, road, ditch or other property located and held prior to the location of such ditch; and whenever it is necessary to convey any ditch over, or across, or above any lode or mining claim, the company shall, if necessary to keep the water of said ditch out from any claim, flume the ditch so far as necessary to protect such claim or property from the water of said ditch; provided, that in all cases where the ditch has priority of right by location, the owners of such claim or property shall be compelled to protect themselves from any damages that might be created by said ditch, and the owner of such claim shall be liable for any damages resulting to said ditch by reason of the works or operations performed on such claim or property.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 34, Tit. I, § 31; Laws 1884, ch. 24, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 535; R.S. 1899, § 3069; C.S. 1910, § 4011; C.S. 1920, § 5084; R.S. 1931, § 28-145; C.S. 1945, § 44-139; W.S. 1957, § 17-190.

Cross references. —

As to care, maintenance and protection of irrigation ditches, see §

41-5-101

et seq.

Meaning of “this article” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-12-101

.

Section uses mandatory language. —

This section speaks in what the supreme court has thought about from time to time as being “mandatory” language. Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. McGuire, 537 P.2d 1128,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1975).

But it was not intended to make an insurer out of ditch owners.

Wheatland Irrigation Dist. v. McGuire, 537 P.2d 1128,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1975).

Waiver of right to damages. —

Where water from spills in defendant's irrigation reservoir flowed onto plaintiff's land, and plaintiff, instead of acquiescing in defendant's offer to construct drainage ditches to divert the water away from his land, authorized defendant to allow water to flow there, he waived his right to recover damages for such alleged flowage until consent was withdrawn. Howell v. Big Horn Basin Colonization Co., 14 Wyo. 14, 81 P. 785,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1905).

Cited

in

Willey v. Decker, 11 Wyo. 496, 73 P. 210,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1903).

§ 17-12-104.
Applicability of W.S. 17-12-101 through 17-12-104 to existing companies.

This act [§§

17-12-101

through

17-12-104

] shall apply to all ditch companies already formed and incorporated under the laws of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1884, ch. 24, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 536; R.S. 1899, § 3071; Laws 1907, ch. 86, § 17; C.S. 1910, § 4013; C.S. 1920, § 5086; R.S. 1931, § 28-147; C.S. 1945, § 44-140; W.S. 1957, § 17-191.

§ 17-12-105.
Authority of ditch and water companies to issue bonds and mortgage property.

Every corporation organized under the laws of Wyoming for the purpose of constructing or operating a system of waterworks, within the corporate limits of any city or town, and every ditch and water company organized under the laws of Wyoming shall have power, and is hereby authorized to mortgage or execute deeds of trust in whole or in part, of their real and personal property and franchises, to secure money borrowed by them for the construction or operation of their waterworks, or ditches, and may also issue their corporate bonds, to make all of said bonds payable to bearer, or otherwise, negotiable by delivery and bearing interest at such rates, and may sell the same at such rates and prices as they may deem proper; and said bonds shall be made payable at such times, and the principal and interest thereof may be made payable within or without this state, at such place or places as may be determined upon by said company.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 88, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3070; C.S. 1910, § 4012; C.S. 1920, § 5085; R.S. 1931, § 28-146; C.S. 1945, § 44-141; W.S. 1957, § 17-192.

Cross references. —

As to franchise of private corporations to operate waterworks in cities and towns, see §

15-7-701

et seq.

§ 17-12-106.
Certificate of flume company.

When any company shall organize under the provisions of this article to form a company for the purpose of constructing a flume, their certificate, in addition to the matters required in the first section of this article, shall specify as follows: the place of beginning, the termini and the route so near as may be, and the purpose for which such flume is intended, and when organized according to the provisions of this chapter, said company shall have the right-of-way over the line proposed in such certificate for such flume; provided, it does not conflict with the right of any farmer, fluming, ditching or other company.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 34, Tit. I, § 32; R.S. 1887, § 537; R.S. 1899, § 3072; C.S. 1910, § 4014; C.S. 1920, § 5087; R.S. 1931, § 28-148; C.S. 1945, § 44-142; W.S. 1957, § 17-193.

Cross references. —

As to power of eminent domain, see §

1-26-501

et seq.

As to right-of-way of any ditch or flume for mining purposes, see §

30-1-118

.

Meaning of “this article” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-12-101

.

§ 17-12-107.
Certificate of telegraph company.

Whenever any three (3) or more persons associate under the provisions of this article, to form a company for the purpose of constructing a line or lines of magnetic telegraph in this state, their certificate shall specify as follows: the termini of such line or lines, and the counties through which they shall pass; and such corporation is hereby authorized to construct said telegraph line or lines from point to point along and upon any of the public roads, by the erection of the necessary fixtures, including posts, piers and abutments, necessary for the wires; provided, that the same shall not incommode the public in the use of said roads or highways.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 34, Tit. I, § 38; R.S. 1887, § 541; R.S. 1899, § 3076; C.S. 1910, § 9018; C.S. 1920, § 5091; R.S. 1931, § 28-149; C.S. 1945, § 44-144; W.S. 1957, § 17-194.

Cross references. —

As to power of eminent domain, see §

1-26-801

et seq.

As to assessment of telegraph and telephone companies, see §

39-13-102

.

Meaning of “this article” —

See note under same catchline following §

17-12-101

.